Illinois, session 104th, SB1295.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-53 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-53)8    Sec. 2605-53. 9-1-1 system; sexual assault and sexual 9abuse.10    (a) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, in 11consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and the 12Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board, shall:13        (1) develop comprehensive guidelines for 14    evidence-based, trauma-informed, victim-centered handling 15    of sexual assault or sexual abuse calls by Public Safety 16    Answering Point telecommunicators; and17        (2) adopt rules and minimum standards for an 18    evidence-based, trauma-informed, victim-centered training 19    curriculum for handling of sexual assault or sexual abuse 20    calls for Public Safety Answering Point telecommunicators 21    ("PSAP").22    (a-5) Within one year after June 3, 2021 (the effective 23date of Public Act 102-9), the Office of the Statewide 9-1-1   SB1295 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1Administrator, in consultation with the Statewide 9-1-1 2Advisory Board, shall: 3        (1) develop comprehensive guidelines for training on 4    emergency dispatch procedures, including, but not limited 5    to, emergency medical dispatch, and the delivery of 9-1-1 6    services and professionalism for public safety 7    telecommunicators and public safety telecommunicator 8    supervisors; and 9        (2) adopt rules and minimum standards for continuing 10    education on emergency dispatch procedures, including, but 11    not limited to, emergency medical dispatch, and the 12    delivery of 9-1-1 services and professionalism for public 13    safety telecommunicators and public safety 14    telecommunicator Supervisors. 15    (a-10) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator may 16as necessary establish by rule appropriate testing and 17certification processes consistent with the training required 18by this Section. 19    (a-15) Beginning January 1, 2026, all 9-1-1 20telecommunicators who provide dispatch for emergency medical 21conditions shall be required to be trained, utilizing the most 22current nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care 23guidelines, in high-quality telecommunicator cardiopulmonary 24resuscitation (T-CPR). The instruction shall incorporate 25recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrests 26(OHCA), compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)   SB1295 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1instructions for callers or bystanders, and continuing 2education. 3    (b) Training requirements:4        (1) Newly hired PSAP telecommunicators must complete 5    the sexual assault and sexual abuse training curriculum 6    established in subsection (a) of this Section prior to 7    handling emergency calls.8        (2) All existing PSAP telecommunicators shall complete 9    the sexual assault and sexual abuse training curriculum 10    established in subsection (a) of this Section within 2 11    years of January 1, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 12    99-801).13        (3) Newly hired public safety telecommunicators shall 14    complete the emergency dispatch procedures training 15    curriculum established in subsection (a-5) of this Section 16    prior to independently handling emergency calls within one 17    year of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator establishing the 18    required guidelines, rules, and standards. 19        (4) All public safety telecommunicators and public 20    safety telecommunicator supervisors who were not required 21    to complete new hire training prior to handling emergency 22    calls, must either demonstrate proficiency or complete the 23    training established in subsection (a-5) of this Section 24    within one year of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator 25    establishing the required guidelines, rules, and 26    standards.   SB1295 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1        (5) Upon completion of the training required in either 2    paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection (b), whichever is 3    applicable, all public safety telecommunicators and public 4    safety telecommunicator supervisors shall complete the 5    continuing education training regarding the delivery of 6    9-1-1 services and professionalism biennially. 7    (c) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules for the 8administration of this Section.9    (d) As used in this Section, "telecommunicator 10cardiopulmonary resuscitation" or "T-CPR" means 11dispatcher-assisted delivery of cardiopulmonary resuscitation 12(CPR) instruction by trained emergency call takers or public 13safety dispatchers to callers or bystanders for events 14requiring CPR, such as out-of-hospital cardiac arrest (OHCA).15(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 16    Section 10. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 17Act is amended by changing Section 3.70 as follows: 18    (210 ILCS 50/3.70)19    Sec. 3.70. Emergency Medical Dispatcher. 20    (a) "Emergency Medical Dispatcher" means a person who has 21successfully completed a training course in emergency medical 22dispatching and telecommunicator cardiopulmonary 23resuscitation (T-CPR) in accordance with rules adopted by the 24Department pursuant to this Act, who accepts calls from the   SB1295 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1public for emergency medical services and dispatches 2designated emergency medical services personnel and vehicles. 3The Emergency Medical Dispatcher must use the 4Department-approved emergency medical dispatch priority 5reference system (EMDPRS) protocol selected for use by its 6agency and approved by its EMS medical director. This protocol 7must be used by an emergency medical dispatcher in an 8emergency medical dispatch agency to dispatch aid to medical 9emergencies which includes systematized caller interrogation 10questions; systematized prearrival support instructions; and 11systematized coding protocols that match the dispatcher's 12evaluation of the injury or illness severity with the vehicle 13response mode and vehicle response configuration and includes 14an appropriate training curriculum and testing process 15consistent with the specific EMDPRS protocol used by the 16emergency medical dispatch agency. Prearrival support 17instructions shall be provided in a non-discriminatory manner 18and shall be provided in accordance with the EMDPRS 19established by the EMS medical director of the EMS system in 20which the EMD operates. If the dispatcher operates under the 21authority of an Emergency Telephone System Board established 22under the Emergency Telephone System Act, the protocols shall 23be established by such Board in consultation with the EMS 24Medical Director.25    (b) The Department shall have the authority and 26responsibility to:  SB1295 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1        (1) Require licensure and relicensure of a person who 2    meets the training and other requirements as an emergency 3    medical dispatcher pursuant to this Act.4        (2) Require licensure and relicensure of a person, 5    organization, or government agency that operates an 6    emergency medical dispatch agency that meets the minimum 7    standards prescribed by the Department for an emergency 8    medical dispatch agency pursuant to this Act.9        (3) Prescribe minimum education and continuing 10    education requirements for the Emergency Medical 11    Dispatcher, which meet standards specified by rules 12    adopted pursuant to this Act.13        (4) Require each EMS Medical Director to report to the 14    Department whenever an action has taken place that may 15    require the revocation or suspension of a license issued 16    by the Department.17        (5) Require each EMD to provide prearrival 18    instructions and telecommunicator cardiopulmonary 19    resuscitation (T-CPR) in compliance with protocols 20    selected and approved by the system's EMS medical director 21    and approved by the Department.22        (6) Require the Emergency Medical Dispatcher to keep 23    the Department currently informed as to the entity or 24    agency that employs or supervises his activities as an 25    Emergency Medical Dispatcher.26        (7) Establish an annual relicensure requirement that   SB1295 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1    requires medical dispatch-specific continuing education as 2    prescribed by the Department through rules adopted 3    pursuant to this Act.4        (8) Approve all EMDPRS protocols used by emergency 5    medical dispatch agencies to assure compliance with 6    national standards.7        (9) Require that Department-approved emergency medical 8    dispatch training programs are conducted in accordance 9    with national standards.10        (10) Require that the emergency medical dispatch 11    agency be operated in accordance with national standards, 12    including, but not limited to, (i) the use on every 13    request for medical assistance of an emergency medical 14    dispatch priority reference system (EMDPRS) in accordance 15    with Department-approved policies and procedures and (ii) 16    under the approval and supervision of the EMS medical 17    director, the establishment of a continuous quality 18    improvement program.19        (11) Require that a person may not represent himself 20    or herself, nor may an agency or business represent an 21    agent or employee of that agency or business, as an 22    emergency medical dispatcher unless licensed by the 23    Department as an emergency medical dispatcher.24        (12) Require that a person, organization, or 25    government agency not represent itself as an emergency 26    medical dispatch agency unless the person, organization,   SB1295 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1    or government agency is certified by the Department as an 2    emergency medical dispatch agency.3        (13) Require that a person, organization, or 4    government agency may not offer or conduct a training 5    course that is represented as a course for an emergency 6    medical dispatcher unless the person, organization, or 7    agency is approved by the Department to offer or conduct 8    that course.9        (14) Require that Department-approved emergency 10    medical dispatcher training programs are conducted by 11    instructors licensed by the Department who:12            (i) are, at a minimum, licensed as emergency 13        medical dispatchers;14            (ii) have completed a Department-approved course 15        on methods of instruction;16            (iii) have previous experience in a medical 17        dispatch agency; and18            (iv) have demonstrated experience as an EMS 19        instructor.20        (15) Establish criteria for modifying or waiving 21    Emergency Medical Dispatcher requirements based on (i) the 22    scope and frequency of dispatch activities and the 23    dispatcher's access to training or (ii) whether the 24    previously-attended dispatcher training program merits 25    automatic relicensure for the dispatcher.26        (16) Charge each Emergency Medical Dispatcher   SB1295 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10877 RTM 20959 b1    applicant a fee for licensure and license renewal.2    (c) The Department shall have the authority to suspend, 3revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license of an EMD when, 4after notice and the opportunity for an impartial hearing, the 5Department demonstrates that the licensee has violated this 6Act, violated the rules adopted by the Department, or failed 7to comply with the applicable standard of care. 8(Source: P.A. 98-973, eff. 8-15-14.)